Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5308.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 80124a. (1) Subject to subsection (4), the The secretary of state shall make available for purchase an annual Great Lakes protection specialty watercraft decal. The Great Lakes protection specialty watercraft decal shall be designed by the secretary of state and shall depict some aspect of the Great Lakes or of Great Lakes water quality. (2) The Great Lakes protection specialty watercraft decal shall be sold for $35.00. Revenues from the sale of Great Lakes specialty watercraft decals shall be expended as provided for in section 80124b. (3) The secretary of state may establish the appropriate placement of Great Lakes protection specialty watercraft decals on watercraft so as not to create confusion for law enforcement officers with decals required under section 80124. (4) The secretary of state shall discontinue sales of Great Lakes protection specialty watercraft decals under subsection (1) if the secretary of state is unable to sell at least 2,000 decals in the 2-year period ending September 30, 2006 and at least 500 decals in each fiscal year thereafter. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 1 year after the date it is enacted into law.